Illinois, session 104th, HB4765.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Ammunition Vending Machine Prohibition Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings. The General Assembly 7finds that:8    (1) Unattended vending machines that dispense live 9ammunition pose an unacceptable risk of theft, straw purchase, 10and access by minors.11    (2) No existing State regulatory scheme adequately 12supervises the real-time identity verification or safe-storage 13requirements necessary for ammunition sales.14    (3) Therefore, the operation of such machines is contrary 15to the public health, safety, and welfare. 16    Section 10. Definitions. 17    "Ammunition" has the meaning ascribed to that term in 18 18U.S.C. 921(a)(17).19    "Ammunition vending machine" means any mechanical or 20electronic device that, upon insertion of money, tokens, or 21any other form of payment, automatically dispenses ammunition 22without the contemporaneous oversight of a licensed dealer or   HB4765- 2 -LRB104 17860 BDA 31294 b1his or her authorized employee. 2    Section 15. Prohibition. No person shall install, 3maintain, place, operate, or cause to be installed, 4maintained, placed, or operated, an ammunition vending machine 5anywhere in the State. 6    Section 20. Penalty. A violation of this Act is a business 7offense punishable by a fine of not less than $1,000 nor more 8than $5,000 for each machine. 9    Section 25. Confiscation and disposal. Ammunition and 10machines seized pursuant to this Act are subject to forfeiture 11under the procedures in the Drug Asset and Forfeiture 12Procedure Act. 13    Section 30. Home rule preemption. A home rule unit may not 14regulate or license the operation of ammunition vending 15machines in a manner inconsistent with the regulation by the 16State of ammunition vending machines under this Act. This 17Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of 18Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent 19exercise by home rule units of powers and function exercised 20by the State. 21    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are   HB4765- 3 -LRB104 17860 BDA 31294 b1severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 31, 2027.